src/phonology/sme-phon.twolc
!!€ muhtum#
!!€ muhtun#

!!€ skoalkkuh#
!!€ skoalkkut#

!!€ nagod#
!!€ nagot#

!!€ bávččag#
!!€ bávččat#

!!€ nuorab#
!!€ nuorat#

!!€ bávččag#
!!€ bávččat#

!!€ eamid#
!!€ eamit#

!!€ alih#
!!€ alit#

!!€ olmmož>X4X7-
!!€ olmmoš>00-

! This test pair irrelevant, as line commented out.
! $ olmmožX7-
! $ olmmoš0-

!!€ olmmož>X4#
!!€ olmmoš>0#


"Word Final Consonant Neutralization 2"
Cx:Cy => # Cns:* (Vow:) Vow: Cns:+ Vow: j: _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( ∑ ) # ; !háliid/háliit
            where Cx in (d)
                  Cy in (t) ;


"Deletion: Final h s j ž in Contracted Stems"
Cx:0 <=> Vow _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ Y5: | Y6: j: ] ; !1.138
!Cx:0 <=> Vow _ [ Y5: | Y6: j: ] ( [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ) ;
!Cx:0 <=> Vow _ [ Y5: | Y6: j: ]   [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # | Cns: ];
			where Cx in (h s j ž) ;
! Debugging, 142 for reference.
! Changed because:-

!!€ fijdnisY5t
!!€ fiidná00t

!!$ fijdnisY5t
!!$ fiidnás0t

!!$ fijdnisY5t
!!$ fiidnis0t

!!€ albmájY5
!!€ albmá00

!!€ olbmožY5
!!€ olbmo00

!!€ fijdnisY5t-
!!€ fiidná00t-

!!€ albmájY5-
!!€ albmá00-

!!€ olbmožY5-
!!€ olbmo00-



"Word Final Cluster Simplification 1"
  Cy:0 <=> Vow Cx _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( ∑ ) [  Hyph  | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
	where Cx in (l r)
	      Cy in (d g) ;
!!€ vuordild-
!!€ vuordil0-

!!$ vuordild-
!!$ vuordild-

"Word Final Cluster Simplification 2"                 ! attestit : attes
  Cx:0 <=> Vow ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (W4:) s _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
			where Cx in (t k m) ;
!!€ attest-
!!€ attes0-

!!$ attest-
!!$ attest-

"Word Final Cluster Simplification 3"                 ! beroštit : beroš
  t:0 <=> Vow š _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
!!€ berošt#
!!€ beroš0#

"Word Final Cluster Simplification 4"                 ! bearjadahka : bearjadat
  Cx:0 <=> Vow h: º:0 _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
			where Cx in (t k) ;
! Changing bearjadahk to bearjadahºk, adding º:0

!!€ bearjadah%ºk-
!!€ bearjadat00-

!!$ bearjadah%ºk-
!!$ bearjadat0k-

!!$ bearjadah%ºk-
!!$ bearjadah00-

!!$ bearjadah%ºk-
!!$ bearjadah0k-

!"Word Final Cluster Simplification 5"                 ! bearjadahka : bearjadat
!  h:t <=> Vow _ º:0 [t:0 | k:0] [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
! Splitting WFCF 4 into 2 to handle the inserted º:0 symbol.
! But this seems already covered by "Word Final Consonant Neutralization 1"


"Word Final Double Consonant Simplification"          ! muitaluss : muitalus
  Cy:0 <=> [ Vow: - á:  ] Cx: ( %>: ) _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( ∑ ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
			where Cx in (s š ž)
				  Cy in (s š ž)
			matched ;
!!€ muitaluss#
!!€ muitalus0#

!!$ vejolažž>-
!!$ vejolažž>-

!!€ vejolažž>-
!!€ vejolaš0>-

!!$ vejolažž>#
!!$ vejolaž0>#




! Consonant gradation rules
! -------------------------


!Now that long double cons. have been analyzed having lexical triple consonants,
!many of the grad. rules of the form º:Cx may be collapsed to a single rule
!without left context: _ Cx Vow: WeG: ; where XXXX matched ; . This has not
!been done yet (PS 29.11.1993).
! But the long double cons have not been analyzed as triple consonants!

"Gradation: h Loss"                                    ! johka : joga (h:0)
  h:0 <=> _ º: Cy: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cy in (p t k c č) ;
!!€ johºkaX4
!!€ jo00ga0

!!$ johºkaX4
!!$ joh0ga0

!!$ johºkaX4
!!$ jo00ka0

!!$ johºkaX4
!!$ joh0ka0

"Gradation: Prenasal Stops"                           ! sápmi : sámi (p:0)
  Cx:0 <=> _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (p t k)
			      Cy in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;

!!€ sápmiX4
!!€ sá0mi0

!!$ sápmiX4
!!$ sápmi0


"Gradation: tnj"                                       ! latnja : lanja (t:0)
  t:0 <=> _ n j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!!€ latnjaX4
!!€ la0nja0

"Gradation: dj"                                        ! vuodjit:vuoján
  d:0 <=> Vow: _ º: j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!!€ vuodºjiQ4n
!!€ vuo00já0n

"Gradation: Double Consonant"                          ! káffe:káfes
  Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (đ f l m n ŋ r s š ŧ v)
			      Cy in (đ f l m n ŋ r s š ŧ v)
			matched ;
!!€ káffeX4s
!!€ ká0fe0s


! Note: I added a t rule, due to substandard Ruotta:Ruotas
"Gradation: Double t"
  t:0 <=> u o _ t a: ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!!€ RuottaX4s
!!€ Ruo0ta0s


!"Gradation: šž"  !Commented out because it causes wordforms like *muitalepmožis. Instead we now have !this in lexicon:
!nju0nuš:njunnuš MALIS ;
!nju0nuš:njunnuž MALIS ; !SUB
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: _ X2: Vow ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) ;	! njunnoša:njunnožis
!  Cx:Cy => Vow: _ X2: Vow ( StemCns:) (:StemCns) ;	! njunnoša:njunnožis
!		    where Cx in (š)
!		          Cy in (ž)
!			matched ;
!!!€ njunnošX2a
!!!€ njunnož0a


"Gradation: Preaspirated Geminates"                    ! áhkku:áhkus
  Cx:0 <=> h _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (k p t c č l r)
			      Cy in (k p t c č l r)
			matched ;
!!€ áhkkuX4s
!!€ áh0ku0s

"Gradation: Jodded Double Consonants"                       ! viellja:vieljas
  Cx:0 <=> Vow: _ Cy j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;    ! mannji:manjis
			where Cx in (l d n)                 ! áddjá:ádjás
			      Cy in (l d n)
			matched ;
!!€ vielljaX4
!!€ vie0lja0

!!€ mannjiX4
!!€ ma0nji0

!!€ áddjáX4
!!€ á0djá0

"Gradation: Cluster Non-nasal Sonorant + Non-sonorant"      ! lájºbi:láibbi
  º:Cx <=> Vow: [ g | l | r | đ | v | j: ] _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (f g d b k p t z ž c č s š)
			      Cz in (f g d b k p t z ž c č s š)
			matched ;
! Added (¤:), evaluate! XXX. (Removed it since it caused CG in some PrsPrc.TO)
!!€ lájºbiX4
!!€ láibbi0

"Gradation: Cluster ŋ + Non-sonorant"                      ! seaŋºga:seaŋgga
  º:Cx <=> Vow: ŋ _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;   ! boŋºkit:boŋkkii
			where Cx in ( g k )
			      Cz in ( g k )
			matched ;
!!€ seaŋºga>X4
!!€ seaŋgga>0

!!€ boŋºki>X4j#
!!€ boŋkki>0i#

!!€ boŋºki>X4jmet#
!!€ boŋkki>0imet#

"Gradation: Cluster ft:ftt"                      ! sáfºta:sáftta
  º:t <=> Vow: f _ t Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!!€ sáfºtaX4
!!€ sáftta0

"Gradation: Cluster bn:bnn"			! oabºna:oabnna
  º:n <=> Vow: b _ n Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!!€ oabºnaX4
!!€ oabnna0

"Gradation: Cluster m + Non-sonorant"                       ! lámºpa:lámppas
  º:Cx <=> Vow: m _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;    ! ránºska:ránskkas
			where Cx in (f b p s š t)
			      Cz in (f b p s š t)
			matched ;
! mt : mtt added bec. of ámta:ámttas, although not in grammar. Check norm!
!!€ ámºtaX4
!!€ ámtta0

! This rule only applies to lexical entries written with non-standard n.
! The rule itself is ok, and requried for proper gradation of the lexical
! entries. Thus, the rule is not in itself !SUB, but the entries in the
! lexicon are, and should be marked accordingly.
"Gradation: Cluster n + Non-sonorant"                      ! Inºgá:Inggás
  º:Cx <=> Vow: n _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in ( g k )
			      Cz in ( g k )
			matched ;
!!€ InºgáX4
!!€ Inggá0
! The proper way of writing is Iŋgá/Iŋggás. We add a substandard pattern with n here,
! as we have seen it in use (56 Ingá, 18 Inggá!).


"Gradation: Cluster n + Non-sonorant"                       ! gánºda:gánddat
  º:Cx <=> Vow: n _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (d t z ž c č s š)
			      Cz in (d t z ž c č s š)
			matched ;
!!€ gánºdaX4
!!€ gándda0


"Gradation: Cluster p + t"                                  ! konseapºta:konseapttat
  º:t <=> Vow: p _ t Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
! Added because of this word. The pattern is not in the grammar.
!!€ konseapºtaX4
!!€ konseaptta0


"Gradation: Cluster j/v + Liquid"                           ! ájºru:áirrut
  º:Cx <=> Vow: [ j: | v ] _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (l r)
			      Cz in (l r)
			matched ;
!!€ ájºruX4
!!€ áirru0

!!€ bievºlaX4
!!€ bievlla0

"Gradation: Cluster r + l"                           ! ájºru:áirrut
  º:l <=> Vow: r _ l Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!!€ jarºlaX4
!!€ jarlla0


"Gradation: Clusters lv, rj etc."                           ! olºju:oljjus
  º:Cx <=> Vow: [ đ | l | r | n ] _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (v j)
			      Cz in (v j)
			matched ;
!!€ olºjuX4
!!€ oljju0


"Gradation: Clusters tk, tm"                                ! mátºki:mátkkis
  º:Cx <=> Vow: [ t | ŧ ] _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (k m)
			      Cy in (k m)
			matched ;
! ŧ is missing in the grammar. example?
!!€ mátºkiX4
!!€ mátkki0


"Gradation: Clusters ts"                               !
  º:s <=> [Vow:|r:] t  _ s Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!!€ kreatºsaX4
!!€ kreatssa0

"Gradation: Clusters ps"                               !
  º:s <=> [Vow:|r:] p  _ s Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;

!!€ korpºsaX4
!!€ korpssa0


"Gradation: Clusters sk, sm etc."                          ! beasºka:beaskka
  º:Cx <=> Vow: [ s | š ] _ Cz: Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b k p t l m v)
			      Cz in (b k p t l m v)
			matched ;
!!€ beasºkaX4
!!€ beaskka0


"Gradation: Cluster vj"                                    ! čoavºji:čoavjji
  º:j <=> Vow: v _ j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!!€ čoavºjiX4
!!€ čoavjji0


"Gradation: Cluster jv"                                    ! beajºvi:beaivvit
  º:v <=> Vow: j: _ v Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!!€ beajºviX4
!!€ beaivvi0

"Gradation: ihm, vhl etc."                                 ! dujhºmi:duihmmit
  º:Cx <=> Vow: [ j: | v ] h _ Cy Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (l m n)
			      Cy in (l m n)
			matched ;
!!€ dujhºmiX4
!!€ duihmmi0


"Gradation: Clusters lbm, jdn, vdn etc."                   ! čuolbma:čuolmma
  Cx:Cy <=> [ l | j: | v | đ ] _ Cz Vow (Cns) ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g )
			      Cy in (m n ŋ)
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!!€ čuolbmaX4
!!€ čuolmma0

"Gradation: Clusters lm, jn, vn etc."                   ! Dálma:Dálmma
  º:Cx <=> [ l | j: | v ] _ Cy Vow (Cns) ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (m n)
			      Cy in (m n)
			matched ;
!!€ DálºmaX4
!!€ Dálmma0


! "(Cns)" is added. I do not like it. But the rule as it was blocked the
! "olmmožin" essive of "olmmoš", since the "ž" was neither an underlying
! nor a surface stem consonant, I had to do something. The rule as it stands
! is meaningless, "(Cns)" contains both (StemCns:) and (:StemCns).
! Think through this.


"Gradation: Clusters ldnj, vdnj etc."                      ! sávdnji:sávnnji
  d:n <=> [ l | v ] _ n j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
!!€ sávdnjiX4
!!€ sávnnji0


"Gradation: Clusters rbm, rdn rgŋ"                        ! čorbma:čorpma
  Cx:Cy <=> r _ Cz Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g)
			      Cy in (p t k)
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!!€ čorbmaX4
!!€ čorpma0


"Gradation: Clusters rdnj"                                 ! skurdnji:skurtnji
  Cx:Cy <=> r _ Cz j Vow ( StemCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (:StemCns) WeG: ;
			where Cx in (b d g)
			      Cy in (p t k)
			      Cz in (m n ŋ)
			matched ;
!!€ skurdnjiX4
!!€ skurtnji0
